hyph-utf8/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/tex/hyph-kk.tex
.в2л
в1м
.в2м
в1н
.в2н
в1ң
.в2ң
в1р
.в2р
в1у
.в2у
г1б
.г2б
г1в
.г2в
г1г
.г2г
г1ғ
.г2ғ
г1д
.г2д
г1ж
.г2ж
г1з
.г2з
г1һ
.г2һ
г1к
.г2к
г1қ
.г2қ
г1п
.г2п
г1с
.г2с
г1т
.г2т
г1ф
.г2ф
г1х
.г2х
г1ц
.г2ц
г1ч
.г2ч
г1ш
.г2ш
г1щ
.г2щ
г1й
.г2й
г1л
.г2л
г1м
.г2м
г1н
.г2н
г1ң
.г2ң
г1р
.г2р
г1у
.г2у
ғ1б
.ғ2б
ғ1в
.ғ2в
ғ1г
.ғ2г
ғ1ғ
.ғ2ғ
ғ1д
.ғ2д
ғ1ж
.ғ2ж
ғ1з
.ғ2з
ғ1һ
.ғ2һ
ғ1к
.ғ2к
ғ1қ
.ғ2қ
ғ1п
.ғ2п
ғ1с
.ғ2с
ғ1т
.ғ2т
ғ1ф
.ғ2ф
ғ1х
.ғ2х
ғ1ц
.ғ2ц
ғ1ч
.ғ2ч
ғ1ш
.ғ2ш
ғ1щ
.ғ2щ
ғ1й
.ғ2й
ғ1л
.ғ2л
ғ1м
.ғ2м
ғ1н
.ғ2н
ғ1ң
.ғ2ң
ғ1р
.ғ2р
ғ1у
.ғ2у
д1б
.д2б
д1в
.д2в
д1г
.д2г
д1ғ
.д2ғ
д1д
.д2д
д1ж
.д2ж
д1з
.д2з
д1һ
.д2һ
д1к
.д2к
д1қ
.д2қ
д1п
.д2п
д1с
.д2с
д1т
.д2т
д1ф
.д2ф
д1х
.д2х
д1ц
.д2ц
д1ч
.д2ч
д1ш
.д2ш
д1щ
.д2щ
д1й
.д2й
д1л
.д2л
д1м
.д2м
д1н
.д2н
д1ң
.д2ң
д1р
.д2р
д1у
.д2у
ж1б
.ж2б
ж1в
.ж2в
ж1г
.ж2г
ж1ғ
.ж2ғ
ж1д
.ж2д
ж1ж
.ж2ж
ж1з
.ж2з
ж1һ
.ж2һ
ж1к
.ж2к
ж1қ
.ж2қ
ж1п
.ж2п
ж1с
.ж2с
ж1т
.ж2т
ж1ф
.ж2ф
ж1х
.ж2х
ж1ц
.ж2ц
ж1ч
.ж2ч
ж1ш
.ж2ш
ж1щ
.ж2щ
ж1й
.ж2й
ж1л
.ж2л
ж1м
.ж2м
ж1н
.ж2н
ж1ң
.ж2ң
ж1р
.ж2р
ж1у
.ж2у
з1б
.з2б
з1в
.з2в
з1г
.з2г
з1ғ
.з2ғ
з1д
.з2д
з1ж
.з2ж
з1з
.з2з
з1һ
.з2һ
з1к
.з2к
з1қ
.з2қ
з1п
.з2п
з1с
.з2с
з1т
.з2т
з1ф
.з2ф
з1х
.з2х
з1ц
.з2ц
з1ч
.з2ч
з1ш
.з2ш
з1щ
.з2щ
з1й
.з2й
з1л
.з2л
з1м
.з2м
з1н
.з2н
з1ң
.з2ң
з1р
.з2р
з1у
.з2у
һ1б
.һ2б
һ1в
.һ2в
һ1г
.һ2г
һ1ғ
.һ2ғ
һ1д
.һ2д
һ1ж
.һ2ж
һ1з
.һ2з
һ1һ
.һ2һ
һ1к
.һ2к
һ1қ
.һ2қ
һ1п
.һ2п
һ1с
.һ2с
һ1т
.һ2т
һ1ф
.һ2ф
һ1х
.һ2х
һ1ц
.һ2ц
һ1ч
.һ2ч
һ1ш
.һ2ш
һ1щ
.һ2щ
һ1й
.һ2й
һ1л
.һ2л
һ1м
.һ2м
һ1н
.һ2н
һ1ң
.һ2ң
һ1р
.һ2р
һ1у
.һ2у
к1б
.к2б
к1в
.к2в
к1г
.к2г
к1ғ
.к2ғ
к1д
.к2д
к1ж
.к2ж
к1з
.к2з
к1һ
.к2һ
к1к
.к2к
к1қ
.к2қ
к1п
.к2п
к1с
.к2с
к1т
.к2т
к1ф
.к2ф
к1х
.к2х
к1ц
.к2ц
к1ч
.к2ч
к1ш
.к2ш
к1щ
.к2щ
к1й
.к2й
к1л
.к2л
к1м
.к2м
к1н
.к2н
к1ң
.к2ң
к1р
.к2р
к1у
.к2у
қ1б
.қ2б
қ1в
.қ2в
қ1г
.қ2г
қ1ғ
.қ2ғ
қ1д
.қ2д
қ1ж
.қ2ж
қ1з
.қ2з
қ1һ
.қ2һ
қ1к
.қ2к
қ1қ
.қ2қ
қ1п
.қ2п
қ1с
.қ2с
қ1т
.қ2т
қ1ф
.қ2ф
қ1х
.қ2х
қ1ц
.қ2ц
қ1ч
.қ2ч
қ1ш
.қ2ш
қ1щ
.қ2щ
қ1й
.қ2й
қ1л
.қ2л
қ1м
.қ2м
қ1н
.қ2н
қ1ң
.қ2ң
қ1р
.қ2р
қ1у
.қ2у
п1б
.п2б
п1в
.п2в
п1г
.п2г
п1ғ
.п2ғ
п1д
.п2д
п1ж
.п2ж
п1з
.п2з
п1һ
.п2һ
п1к
.п2к
п1қ
.п2қ
п1п
.п2п
п1с
.п2с
п1т
.п2т
п1ф
.п2ф
п1х
.п2х
п1ц
.п2ц
п1ч
.п2ч
п1ш
.п2ш
п1щ
.п2щ
п1й
.п2й
п1л
.п2л
п1м
.п2м
п1н
.п2н
п1ң
.п2ң
п1р
.п2р
п1у
.п2у
с1б
.с2б
с1в
.с2в
с1г
.с2г
с1ғ
.с2ғ
с1д
.с2д
с1ж
.с2ж
с1з
.с2з
с1һ
.с2һ
с1к
.с2к
с1қ
.с2қ
с1п
.с2п
с1с
.с2с
с1т
.с2т
с1ф
.с2ф
с1х
.с2х
с1ц
.с2ц
с1ч
.с2ч
с1ш
.с2ш
с1щ
.с2щ
с1й
.с2й
с1л
.с2л
с1м
.с2м
с1н
.с2н
с1ң
.с2ң
с1р
.с2р
с1у
.с2у
т1б
.т2б
т1в
.т2в
т1г
.т2г
т1ғ
.т2ғ
т1д
.т2д
т1ж
.т2ж
т1з
.т2з
т1һ
.т2һ
т1к
.т2к
т1қ
.т2қ
т1п
.т2п
т1с
.т2с
т1т
.т2т
т1ф
.т2ф
т1х
.т2х
т1ц
.т2ц
т1ч
.т2ч
т1ш
.т2ш
т1щ
.т2щ
т1й
.т2й
т1л
.т2л
т1м
.т2м
т1н
.т2н
т1ң
.т2ң
т1р
.т2р
т1у
.т2у
ф1б
.ф2б
ф1в
.ф2в
ф1г
.ф2г
ф1ғ
.ф2ғ
ф1д
.ф2д
ф1ж
.ф2ж
ф1з
.ф2з
ф1һ
.ф2һ
ф1к
.ф2к
ф1қ
.ф2қ
ф1п
.ф2п
ф1с
.ф2с
ф1т
.ф2т
ф1ф
.ф2ф
ф1х
.ф2х
ф1ц
.ф2ц
ф1ч
.ф2ч
ф1ш
.ф2ш
ф1щ
.ф2щ
ф1й
.ф2й
ф1л
.ф2л
ф1м
.ф2м
ф1н
.ф2н
ф1ң
.ф2ң
ф1р
.ф2р
ф1у
.ф2у
х1б
.х2б
х1в
.х2в
х1г
.х2г
х1ғ
.х2ғ
х1д
.х2д
х1ж
.х2ж
х1з
.х2з
х1һ
.х2һ
х1к
.х2к
х1қ
.х2қ
х1п
.х2п
х1с
.х2с
х1т
.х2т
х1ф
.х2ф
х1х
.х2х
х1ц
.х2ц
х1ч
.х2ч
х1ш
.х2ш
х1щ
.х2щ
х1й
.х2й
х1л
.х2л
х1м
.х2м
х1н
.х2н
х1ң
.х2ң
х1р
.х2р
х1у
.х2у
ц1б
.ц2б
ц1в
.ц2в
ц1г
.ц2г
ц1ғ
.ц2ғ
ц1д
.ц2д
ц1ж
.ц2ж
ц1з
.ц2з
ц1һ
.ц2һ
ц1к
.ц2к
ц1қ
.ц2қ
ц1п
.ц2п
ц1с
.ц2с
ц1т
.ц2т
ц1ф
.ц2ф
ц1х
.ц2х
ц1ц
.ц2ц
ц1ч
.ц2ч
ц1ш
.ц2ш
ц1щ
.ц2щ
ц1й
.ц2й
ц1л
.ц2л
ц1м
.ц2м
ц1н
.ц2н
ц1ң
.ц2ң
ц1р
.ц2р
ц1у
.ц2у
ч1б
.ч2б
ч1в
.ч2в
ч1г
.ч2г
ч1ғ
.ч2ғ
ч1д
.ч2д
ч1ж
.ч2ж
ч1з
.ч2з
ч1һ
.ч2һ
ч1к
.ч2к
ч1қ
.ч2қ
ч1п
.ч2п
ч1с
.ч2с
ч1т
.ч2т
ч1ф
.ч2ф
ч1х
.ч2х
ч1ц
.ч2ц
ч1ч
.ч2ч
ч1ш
.ч2ш
ч1щ
.ч2щ
ч1й
.ч2й
ч1л
.ч2л
ч1м
.ч2м
ч1н
.ч2н
ч1ң
.ч2ң
ч1р
.ч2р
ч1у
.ч2у
ш1б
.ш2б
ш1в
.ш2в
ш1г
.ш2г
ш1ғ
.ш2ғ
ш1д
.ш2д
ш1ж
.ш2ж
ш1з
.ш2з
ш1һ
.ш2һ
ш1к
.ш2к
ш1қ
.ш2қ
ш1п
.ш2п
ш1с
.ш2с
ш1т
.ш2т
ш1ф
.ш2ф
ш1х
.ш2х
ш1ц
.ш2ц
ш1ч
.ш2ч
ш1ш
.ш2ш
ш1щ
.ш2щ
ш1й
.ш2й
ш1л
.ш2л
ш1м
.ш2м
ш1н
.ш2н
ш1ң
.ш2ң
ш1р
.ш2р
ш1у
.ш2у
щ1б
.щ2б
щ1в
.щ2в
щ1г
.щ2г
щ1ғ
.щ2ғ
щ1д
.щ2д
щ1ж
.щ2ж
щ1з
.щ2з
щ1һ
.щ2һ
щ1к
.щ2к
щ1қ
.щ2қ
щ1п
.щ2п
щ1с
.щ2с
щ1т
.щ2т
щ1ф
.щ2ф
щ1х
.щ2х
щ1ц
.щ2ц
щ1ч
.щ2ч
щ1ш
.щ2ш
щ1щ
.щ2щ
щ1й
.щ2й
щ1л
.щ2л
щ1м
.щ2м
щ1н
.щ2н
щ1ң
.щ2ң
щ1р
.щ2р
щ1у
.щ2у
й1б
.й2б
й1в
.й2в
й1г
.й2г
й1ғ
.й2ғ
й1д
.й2д
й1ж
.й2ж
й1з
.й2з
й1һ
.й2һ
й1к
.й2к
й1қ
.й2қ
й1п
.й2п
й1с
.й2с
й1т
.й2т
й1ф
.й2ф
й1х
.й2х
й1ц
.й2ц
й1ч
.й2ч
й1ш
.й2ш
й1щ
.й2щ
й1й
.й2й
й1л
.й2л
й1м
.й2м
й1н
.й2н
й1ң
.й2ң
й1р
.й2р
й1у
.й2у
л1б
.л2б
л1в
.л2в
л1г
.л2г
л1ғ
.л2ғ
л1д
.л2д
л1ж
.л2ж
л1з
.л2з
л1һ
.л2һ
л1к
.л2к
л1қ
.л2қ
л1п
.л2п
л1с
.л2с
л1т
.л2т
л1ф
.л2ф
л1х
.л2х
л1ц
.л2ц
л1ч
.л2ч
л1ш
.л2ш
л1щ
.л2щ
л1й
.л2й
л1л
.л2л
л1м
.л2м
л1н
.л2н
л1ң
.л2ң
л1р
.л2р
л1у
.л2у
м1б
.м2б
м1в
.м2в
м1г
.м2г
м1ғ
.м2ғ
м1д
.м2д
м1ж
.м2ж
м1з
.м2з
м1һ
.м2һ
м1к
.м2к
м1қ
.м2қ
м1п
.м2п
м1с
.м2с
м1т
.м2т
м1ф
.м2ф
м1х
.м2х
м1ц
.м2ц
м1ч
.м2ч
м1ш
.м2ш
м1щ
.м2щ
м1й
.м2й
м1л
.м2л
м1м
.м2м
м1н
.м2н
м1ң
.м2ң
м1р
.м2р
м1у
.м2у
н1б
.н2б
н1в
.н2в
н1г
.н2г
н1ғ
.н2ғ
н1д
.н2д
н1ж
.н2ж
н1з
.н2з
н1һ
.н2һ
н1к
.н2к
н1қ
.н2қ
н1п
.н2п
н1с
.н2с
н1т
.н2т
н1ф
.н2ф
н1х
.н2х
н1ц
.н2ц
н1ч
.н2ч
н1ш
.н2ш
н1щ
.н2щ
н1й
.н2й
н1л
.н2л
н1м
.н2м
н1н
.н2н
н1ң
.н2ң
н1р
.н2р
н1у
.н2у
ң1б
.ң2б
ң1в
.ң2в
ң1г
.ң2г
ң1ғ
.ң2ғ
ң1д
.ң2д
ң1ж
.ң2ж
ң1з
.ң2з
ң1һ
.ң2һ
ң1к
.ң2к
ң1қ
.ң2қ
ң1п
.ң2п
ң1с
.ң2с
ң1т
.ң2т
ң1ф
.ң2ф
ң1х
.ң2х
ң1ц
.ң2ц
ң1ч
.ң2ч
ң1ш
.ң2ш
ң1щ
.ң2щ
ң1й
.ң2й
ң1л
.ң2л
ң1м
.ң2м
ң1н
.ң2н
ң1ң
.ң2ң
ң1р
.ң2р
ң1у
.ң2у
р1б
.р2б
р1в
.р2в
р1г
.р2г
р1ғ
.р2ғ
р1д
.р2д
р1ж
.р2ж
р1з
.р2з
р1һ
.р2һ
р1к
.р2к
р1қ
.р2қ
р1п
.р2п
р1с
.р2с
р1т
.р2т
р1ф
.р2ф
р1х
.р2х
р1ц
.р2ц
р1ч
.р2ч
р1ш
.р2ш
р1щ
.р2щ
р1й
.р2й
р1л
.р2л
р1м
.р2м
р1н
.р2н
р1ң
.р2ң
р1р
.р2р
р1у
.р2у
у1б
.у2б
у1в
.у2в
у1г
.у2г
у1ғ
.у2ғ
у1д
.у2д
у1ж
.у2ж
у1з
.у2з
у1һ
.у2һ
у1к
.у2к
у1қ
.у2қ
у1п
.у2п
у1с
.у2с
у1т
.у2т
у1ф
.у2ф
у1х
.у2х
у1ц
.у2ц
у1ч
.у2ч
у1ш
.у2ш
у1щ
.у2щ
у1й
.у2й
у1л
.у2л
у1м
.у2м
у1н
.у2н
у1ң
.у2ң
у1р
.у2р
у1у
.у2у
% Patterns for triple consonants. There may be additions to this category, as this list is not exhaustive.
у2т1ш
у2т1д
у2т1т
у2т1у
у2т1с
у2т1к
у2т1қ
у2т1г
у2т1ғ
у2т1л
у2т1б
у2т1м
у2т1п
у2т1ш
% Exceptions and single word occurence patterns for words of foreign origin i.e. Russian
с2к1д
л1с2к
л1с2т
с1т2р
н2г1л
н1г2р
с2к1у
}
